Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter  658, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 1, chapter 111,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2021-2023 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 600,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Cascades Student
Success Center .............................. $ 5,105,000
(B) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 25,375,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Extension .......................................$ 5,105,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Heritage Buildings Renovation
(University and Villard
Halls)...............................................$ 5,960,000
(e) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center .............. $ 695,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management .................................. $ 6,615,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 1
(g) Central Oregon Community
College, Classroom Building
Redmond Campus ......................... $ 8,125,000
(h) Chemeketa Community
College, Building 7 Remodel ..... $ 8,125,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........ $ 8,120,000
(j) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
Center .............................................$ 1,540,000
(k) Linn-Benton Community
College, Agricultural Center ..... $ 8,125,000
(L) Mt. Hood Community College,
Accessibility Upgrades,
Dental Hygiene Lab and
Deferred Maintenance ................ $ 8,125,000
(m) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ................. $ 8,125,000
(n) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
Center .............................................$ 7,120,000
(o) Tillamook Bay Community
College, Classroom and
Office Building and
Renovations ................................... $ 8,125,000
(p) Treasure Valley Community
College, Nursing-Allied
Health Professions Center ......... $ 5,015,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,300,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 111,300,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 50,750,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ......................................$ 126,090,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System ...................... $ 3,810,000
(b) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Ashland Armory Service
Life Extension ............................... $ 5,480,000
(B) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension ............................... $ 4,375,000
(C) Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552................................... $ 5,105,000
(D) Washington County
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 2
Readiness Center.......................... $ 5,410,000
(c) Oregon State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion .......................................$ 34,435,000
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ......... $ 62,710,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office ........................... $ 14,490,000
(d) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvement and
Renewal ..........................................$ 70,745,000
(B) Electronic Health Records ......... $ 13,635,000
(C) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ................................ $ 3,825,000
(e) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation ..................................... $ 6,975,000
(B) Capital Improvements ................. $ 11,060,000
(C) Control Room Renovations ........ $ 1,300,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization ............................... $ 7,870,000
(E) MacLaren Infirmary and
Pharmacy Renovation ................. $ 1,720,000
(F) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations ................................... $ 20,795,000
(G) Oak Creek Medical and
Dental Clinic Renovations ......... $ 710,000
(H) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ................................ $ 7,110,000
(I) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ...... $ 10,495,000
(J) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ..................... $ 690,000
(f) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility ....................... $ 4,555,000
(B) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets..........................................$ 3,555,000
(g) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 110,995,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Inlow Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 17,920,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology, OMIC R&D Center
for Additive Manufacturing
Innovation, Phase II .................... $ 5,105,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cascades Student Success
Center .............................................$ 8,930,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 3
(ii) Cordley Hall Renovation,
Phase II ..........................................$ 61,690,000
(E) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse and
Extension .......................................$ 45,585,000
(F) University of Oregon,
Heritage Buildings Renovation
(University and Villard
Halls)...............................................$ 53,285,000
(G) Western Oregon University,
Student Success Center .............. $ 20,920,000
(H) FAMIS System Replacement ..... $ 5,105,000
(h) Department of Education[ :],
Oregon School for the Deaf
ADA Restrooms, Fire Alarm
System Replacement and
Windows Upgrade ................. $ 5,635,000
[(A) Oregon School for the Deaf ]
[ADA Restrooms ........................... $ 1,065,000]
[(B) Oregon School for the Deaf ]
[Fire Alarm System ]
[Replacement .................................. $ 3,145,000]
[(C) Oregon School for the Deaf ]
[Windows Upgrade ....................... $ 1,425,000]
(i) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 2,464,209
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement
Phase II ..........................................$ 1,136,227
(j) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ......... $ 50,750,000
(k) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife,
Capital Improvement
and Renewal .................................. $ 5,105,000
(L) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing and
Permanent Supportive
Housing...........................................$ 413,490,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Benton County Courthouse ........ $ 20,730,000
(B) Clackamas County
Courthouse ..................................... $ 95,400,000
(C)
Crook County Courthouse ......... $ 16,330,000
(D) Linn County Courthouse ............ $ 16,110,000
(E) Supreme Court Building
Renovation ..................................... $ 21,950,000
(n) Legislative Administration
Committee:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 4
(A) Document Publishing
and Management System ............ $ 4,310,000
(B) Capitol Accessibility,
Maintenance, and Safety
Phase III .........................................$ 19,865,000
(o) Oregon Department of
Emergency Management,
Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552................................... $ 5,105,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 180,000,000
(8) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(9) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 50,000,000
(10) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, New Residence
[Hall Facility ................................. $ 55,650,000]
Hall Facility .......................... $ 35,440,000
(b) Oregon State University,
Reser Stadium West
Grandstands................................... $ 40,555,000
(c) Portland State University,
Gateway Center Reuse
and Extension ............................... $ 18,300,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation .............. $ 45,620,000
(b) Justice Building Exterior
Renovations ................................... $ 3,555,000
(c) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
Tenant Improvements .................. $ 74,015,000
(d) Portland State Office
Building Improvements ............... $ 8,730,000
(e) Revenue Building Electrical
System Upgrades .......................... $ 7,120,000
(f) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ....... $ 4,055,000
(g) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................. $ 2,420,791
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ..........................................$ 1,578,773
(h) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 5
System.............................................$ 15,205,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
and Building .................................. $ 131,880,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
Management IT System .............. $ 27,360,000
(i) Department of Justice,
Legal Tools Replacement
Project 3.0 ......................................$ 5,105,000
Total General Obligation
[Bonds .............................................$ 2,408,360,000]
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,388,150,000
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 27, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 6